New York, session 2025-2026, S4983.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The education law is amended by adding a new article 13-D 2 to read as follows: 3 ARTICLE 13-D 4 DUTY TO ADDRESS TERRORISTIC ACTIVITY BY INSTRUCTIONAL STAFF 5 Section 641. Duty to address terroristic activity by instructional 6 staff. 7 § 641. Duty to address terroristic activity by instructional staff. 8 1. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, no college shall receive 9 state funding if a member of such college's instructional staff directly 10 or indirectly promotes, encourages, advocates or engages in any activity 11 on campus in support of a terrorist organization as defined by 8 U.S.C. 12 § 1189, unless such college has taken appropriate corrective steps, in a 13 time and manner as determined by the department. 14 2. The commissioner shall notify any college that they deem to have 15 not taken appropriate corrective steps pursuant to subdivision one of 16 this section and that such college shall not receive state funding until 17 appropriate corrective steps are taken, which the commissioner shall 18 describe. The commissioner shall also notify the director of the divi- 19 sion of budget when a college is ineligible to receive state funding EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD04771-01-5 S. 4983 2 1 pursuant to this section, as well as if and when a college is eligible 2 to receive state funding following appropriate corrective steps. 3 3. For the purposes of this section, "instructional staff" shall mean 4 individuals employed by a college in the following titles: president, 5 dean, director, professor, associate professor, assistant professor, 6 instructor, tutor, fellow, lecturer, librarian, associate librarian, 7 assistant librarian, library assistant, registrar, assistant registrar, 8 registrar's assistant, principal, first assistant, supervisor, assistant 9 teacher, critic teacher, teacher, college science assistant, college 10 science technician, college engineering technician, and any other 11 employees determined by the department to have a direct role in educat- 12 ing students of such college. 13 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately.